Massachusetts, session 194th, H3418.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding sections 32 to 37, inclusive, of chapter 7C of the General
Laws or any other general or special law to the contrary, the commissioner of capital asset
management and maintenance, in consultation with the court administrator of the trial court, may
convey certain adjacent parcels of land in the city of Framingham acquired for the purpose of
erecting a building for the First District Court of Southern Middlesex for nominal consideration
to the city of Framingham; provided, however, that the commissioner shall not convey said
of 2

parcels prior to: (1) the completion of a regional justice center at 121 Union avenue in the city of
Framingham and (2) a determination by the commissioner, in consultation with the court
administrator of the trial court, that the parcels are surplus to the needs of the trial court. The
parcels are located at and known and numbered as 600 and 602 Concord street in the city of
Framingham and are further described in deeds recorded in the Middlesex South district registry
of deeds in book 7816, page 107 and book 9859, page 328. The parcels shall be conveyed by
deed without warranties or representations by the commonwealth and without restrictions on use
or future conveyance by the city. The conveyance shall be subject to such additional conditions
and restrictions as the commissioner of capital asset management and maintenance, in
consultation with the court administrator of the trial court, may determine. The commissioner
may, in consultation with the court administrator of the trial court, determine the exact
boundaries of the parcels prior to conveyance.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the city of
Framingham shall be responsible for all costs and expenses of any transaction authorized by this
act as determined by the commissioner of capital asset management and maintenance, including,
but not limited to, the costs of any engineering, surveys, appraisals, title examinations, recording
fees and deed preparation.
of 2